Tennessee, session 114, SB2611.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 13, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A current or former chancery, circuit, or appellate court judge, who is an
enhanced handgun carry permit holder, pursuant to § 39-17-1351, and has completed
SB2611
012106
- 1 -

the training required in subsection (b) is authorized to carry a firearm in the same
manner and locations that a law enforcement officer may carry a firearm under § 39-17-
1350.
(b) In order to carry a firearm pursuant to this section, a judge must successfully
complete firearms training in accordance with POST (peace officer standards and
training) certification, which must include, at a minimum, forty (40) hours initial training
and eight (8) hours annual in-service training in firearms qualification administered by a
POST-certified firearms training program.
(c) The administrative office of the courts shall develop a uniform identification
system clearly identifying that a judge is qualified under this section to carry a firearm. A
judge authorized to carry a firearm under this section shall carry the identification at all
times the judge is carrying a firearm.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 012106